Tennessee statutes. Title 26 Execution
Chapter 4 Bill to Subject Property
26-4-102. Powers of court to reach property.

The court has power to compel the discovery, and to prevent the transfer, payment, or delivery of the property, and to subject the same to the satisfaction of the judgment or decree, whether such property could, if in the defendant's possession or with the title vested in the defendant, be levied upon by execution or not.

Code 1858, § 4284 (deriv. Acts 1832, ch. 11, § 2); Shan., § 6093; Code 1932, § 10354; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-602.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 458, 460.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 1-69-4.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 9 Tenn. Juris., Discovery, § 2; 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, § 56; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 74.

26-4-103. Implementation of court's powers.

The court is empowered to order all such bonds and other instruments to be executed by either the complainant or defendant, and all such transfers to be made as may be necessary to carry the jurisdiction into complete effect.

Code 1858, § 4285 (deriv. Acts 1832, ch. 11, § 2); Shan., § 6094; Code 1932, § 10355; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-603.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, § 13; 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, § 56.

26-4-104. Lien lis pendens.

The creditor has a lien lis pendens upon the property of the defendant situated in the county of suit, if properly described in the bill of complaint, on the filing of the bill, so far as concerns the pursued defendant; and the creditor may have a lien lis pendens upon all property, so described, as against bona fide purchasers and encumbrancers, for value, upon registration of an abstract of the claimed lien as provided by this Code.

Code 1858, § 4286; Shan., § 6095; mod. Code 1932, § 10356; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-604.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 456, 459.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attachment and Garnishment, § 71; 8 Tenn. Juris., Cresitors' Suits, § 2; 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, §§ 17, 56; 13 Tenn. Juris., Fraudulent and Voluntary Conveyances, § 41; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 74; 18 Tenn. Juris., Lis Pendens, § 5.

Law Reviews.

Creditors' Rights and Security Transactions — 1961 Tennessee Survey (II) (Forrest W. Lacey), 15 Vand. L. Rev. 856.

Preferences, Priorities, and Powers of the State in the Collection of Delinquent Revenue: Tennessee's Tax Enforcement Procedures Act (Donald J. Serkin), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 707.